California, session 20252026, AB2308.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 34177.7 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:34177.7. (a) (1) In addition to the powers granted to each successor agency, and notwithstanding anything in the act adding this part, including, but not limited to, Sections 34162 and 34189, the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco shall have the authority, rights, and powers of the Redevelopment Agency to which it succeeded solely for the purpose of issuing bonds or incurring other indebtedness to finance:(A) The affordable housing required by the Mission Bay North Owner Participation Agreement, the Mission Bay South Owner Participation Agreement, the Disposition and Development Agreement for Hunters Point Shipyard Phase 1, the Candlestick Point-Hunters Point Shipyard Phase 2 Disposition and Development Agreement, and the Transbay Implementation Agreement.(B) (i) The infrastructure required by the Transbay Implementation Agreement.(ii) (I) For the purposes of this subparagraph, and notwithstanding Section 34177.3, the authority, rights, and powers of the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco to issue bonds or incur other indebtedness to finance the infrastructure required by the Transbay Implementation Agreement includes the authority to enter into arrangements with the Transbay Joint Powers Authority and the City and County of San Francisco to extend the time period for pledges of gross sales proceeds and net tax increment.(II) For the purposes of this clause, “net tax increment” excludes all of the following:(ia) Administrative charges, fees, or costs for the City and County of San Francisco.(ib) The portion of the tax increment revenues that the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco is required by law to set-aside in the agency’s Affordable Housing Fund pursuant to law.(ic) A portion of the net tax increment revenues equal to the percentage of the revenue that the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco is required to pay to all governmental entities as required by law.(id) The portion of the tax increment revenues equal to the percentage of the revenues that the State of California may mandate the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco to pay from time to time in the future, including any payments which the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco may be required to pay to the Education Revenue Augmentation Fund pursuant to law.(C) (i) The development, construction, repair, renovation, or reconstruction of up to 5,842 units of affordable housing by or on behalf of the City and County of San Francisco that shall be or remain affordable to, and occupied by, persons and families of low-, moderate-, extremely low, and very low income households for the longest feasible time, but not less than 55 years for rental units and 45 years for owner-occupied units.(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, and notwithstanding Section 34177.3, the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco may create enforceable obligations that are related to the issuance of bonds or incurrence of other indebtedness and may enter into any contracts or arrangements that are related to the development, construction, repair, renovation, or reconstruction of the units of affordable housing, so long as the expenses of any of those arrangements are paid solely from property tax revenues available in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund to the extent the property tax revenues represent the amount of revenues on deposit in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund that otherwise would have been distributed to the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183 remaining after the payment of debt service on the bonds or debt for the applicable fiscal year.(iii) The successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco may enter into arrangements with the City and County of San Francisco for the purpose of providing the proceeds from the issuance of bonds or the incurrence of debt under this subparagraph to the City and County of San Francisco for development, construction, repair, renovation, or reconstruction of the units of affordable housing described in this subparagraph and to facilitate compliance with any obligations of the successor agency resulting from the issuance of bonds or incurrence of debt.(iv) Any costs related to the issuance and administration of bonds issued or debt incurred that are not paid with the proceeds from the sale of those bonds or incurrence of debt shall be repaid solely from property tax revenues available in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund to the extent the property tax revenues represent the amount of revenues on deposit in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund that otherwise would have been distributed to the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183 remaining after the payment of debt service on the bonds or debt for the applicable fiscal year.(2) (A) For purposes of financing the obligations described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1), the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco may pledge to the bonds or other indebtedness the property tax revenues available in the successor agency’s Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund that are not otherwise obligated.(B) For purposes of financing the development, construction, repair, renovation, or reconstruction of the units of affordable housing described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco may pledge to the bonds or other indebtedness issued, incurred, or entered into by the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco the property tax revenues available in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund to the extent the property tax revenues represent the amount of revenues on deposit in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund that otherwise would have been distributed to the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183. Property tax revenues allocated to the successor agency pursuant to this subparagraph for the development, construction, repair, renovation, or reconstruction of the units of affordable housing shall not include any moneys that are payable to local agencies other than the City and County of San Francisco, school districts that maintain kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, community college districts, or the Educational Revenue Augmentation Fund, pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183.(b) Bonds issued pursuant to this section may be sold pursuant to either a negotiated or a competitive sale. The bonds issued or other indebtedness obligations incurred pursuant to this section may be issued or incurred on a parity basis with outstanding bonds or other indebtedness obligations of the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco and may pledge the revenues pledged to those outstanding bonds or other indebtedness obligations to the issuance of bonds or other obligations pursuant to this section. The pledge, when made in connection with the issuance of bonds or other indebtedness obligations under this section, shall have the same lien priority as the pledge of outstanding bonds or other indebtedness obligations, and shall be valid, binding, and enforceable in accordance with its terms.(c) (1) Prior to issuing any bonds or incurring other indebtedness pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco may subordinate to the bonds or other indebtedness the amount required to be paid to an affected taxing entity pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183, provided that the affected taxing entity has approved the subordinations pursuant to this subdivision.(2) At the time the agency requests an affected taxing entity to subordinate the amount to be paid to it, the agency shall provide the affected taxing entity with substantial evidence that sufficient funds will be available to pay both the debt service on the bonds or other indebtedness and the payments required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183, when due.(3) Within 45 days after receipt of the agency’s request, the affected taxing entity shall approve or disapprove the request for subordination. An affected taxing entity may disapprove a request for subordination only if it finds, based upon substantial evidence, that the successor agency will not be able to pay the debt service payments and the amount required to be paid to the affected taxing entity. If the affected taxing entity does not act within 45 days after receipt of the agency’s request, the request to subordinate shall be deemed approved and shall be final and conclusive.(d) Prior to issuing any bonds or incurring other indebtedness pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco may subordinate to the bonds or other indebtedness the amount required to be paid to the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183, provided that the City and County of San Francisco has approved the subordinations.(e) An action may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure to determine the validity of bonds or other obligations authorized by this section, the pledge of revenues to those bonds or other obligations authorized by this section, the legality and validity of all proceedings theretofore taken and, as provided in the resolution of the legislative body of the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco authorizing the bonds or other indebtedness obligations authorized by this section, proposed to be taken for the authorization, execution, issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds or other obligations authorized by this section, and for the payment of debt service on the bonds or the payment of amounts under other obligations authorized by this section. Subdivision (c) of Section 33501 shall not apply to any such action. The department shall be notified of the filing of any action as an affected party.(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including, but not limited to, Section 33501, an action to challenge the issuance of bonds or the incurrence of indebtedness by the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco shall be brought within 30 days after the date on which the oversight board approves the resolution of the agency approving the issuance of bonds or the incurrence of indebtedness under this section.(g) The actions authorized in this section shall be subject to the approval of the oversight board, as provided in Section 34180. Additionally, the oversight board may direct the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco to commence any of the transactions described in subdivision (a) so long as the agency is able to recover its related costs in connection with the transaction. After the agency, with approval of the oversight board, issues any bonds or incurs any indebtedness pursuant to subdivision (a), the oversight board shall not unilaterally approve any amendments to or early termination of the bonds or indebtedness. If, under the authority granted to it by subdivision (h) of Section 34179, the department either reviews and approves or fails to request review within five business days of an oversight board approval of an action authorized by this section, the scheduled payments on the bonds or other indebtedness shall be listed in the Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule and shall not be subject to further review and approval by the department or the Controller. The department may extend its review time to 60 days for actions authorized in this section and may seek the assistance of the Treasurer in evaluating proposed actions under this section.(h) (1) A bond or indebtedness authorized by this section shall be considered indebtedness incurred by the dissolved redevelopment agency, with the same legal effect as if the bonds or other indebtedness had been issued, incurred, or entered into prior to June 28, 2011, in full conformity with the applicable provisions of the Community Redevelopment Law that existed prior to that date, shall be included in the successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco’s Recognized Obligation Payment Schedule, and shall be secured by a pledge of, and lien on, and shall be repaid from moneys deposited from time to time in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 34170.5, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183. Property tax revenues pledged to any bonds or other indebtedness obligations authorized by this section are taxes allocated to the successor agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 33670 and Section 16 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a bond or other indebtedness issued, incurred, or entered into pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be secured by a pledge of, and lien on, and shall be repaid from, moneys deposited in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund, established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 34170.5, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183 only to the extent the moneys represent the amount of moneys on deposit in the Redevelopment Property Tax Trust Fund that otherwise would have been distributed to the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34183. Property tax revenues pledged to any bonds or other indebtedness obligations authorized by this paragraph are taxes allocated to the successor agency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 33670 and Section 16 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.(i) The successor agency to the Redevelopment Agency of the City and County of San Francisco shall make diligent efforts to ensure that the lowest long-term cost financing is obtained. The financing shall not provide for any bullets or spikes and shall not use variable rates. The agency shall make use of an independent financial advisor in developing financing proposals and shall make the work products of the financial advisor available to the department at its request.(j) (1) (A) For the development of the project described in the Candlestick Point-Hunters Point Shipyard Phase 2 Disposition and Development Agreement, the limitations relating to time for establishing loans, advances, and indebtedness, the effectiveness of the redevelopment plans, the time to repay indebtedness, the time for applying tax increment, the number of tax dollars, or any other matters set forth in Section 33333.2 and Section 33492.13 shall not apply.(B) The Candlestick Point-Hunters Point Shipyard Phase 2 project agreements shall establish the applicable limitations relating to time for establishing loans, advances, and indebtedness, the effectiveness of the redevelopment plans, the time to repay indebtedness, the time for applying tax increment, number of tax dollars, or any other matters set forth in Section 33333.2 and Section 33492.13. Any amendments to Candlestick Point-Hunters Point Shipyard Phase 2 project agreements to establish or change those time limits shall be approved by the oversight board, and shall be subject to department approval, as described in this part.(2) This part shall not be construed to limit the receipt and use of property tax revenues generated from the Hunters Point Redevelopment Plan project area or Zone 1 of the Bayview Hunters Point Redevelopment Plan project area for the project described in the Candlestick Point-Hunters Point Shipyard Phase 2 Disposition and Development Agreement.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique transportation and development needs in the City and County of San Francisco and the unique role the Transbay Project has played in enhancing downtown San Francisco property values.